Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 67

Conservators For The Aged And Disabled

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, No. 159, § 1: Jan. 1, 2012.

Cross References. Guardianship of incapacitated persons, §28-65-101 et seq.

28-67-101. Chapter cumulative.

The provisions of this chapter shall be cumulative to the Probate Code. Nothing in this chapter shall amend or repeal related statutes pertaining to the appointment of guardians of the estate of incompetents.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-709n.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

28-67-102. Jurisdiction of the court.

All laws relative to the jurisdiction of the circuit court over the estate of a person under guardianship as an incompetent person, including the investment, management, sale, or mortgage of his or her property and the payment of his or her debts, shall be applicable to the estate of a person under conservatorship.

Court jurisdiction for adult guardianship actions, excluding proceedings under the Adult Custody Maltreatment Act, § 9-20-101 et seq., and conservatorship actions that involve a party residing outside the state shall be determined under the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, § 28-74-101 et seq.

The appropriate jurisdiction for an adult guardianship action under the Adult Custody Maltreatment Act, § 9-20-101 et seq., that involves a maltreated adult residing outside the state shall be determined under the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, § 28-74-101 et seq.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (b) and (c).

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-706; Acts 2011, No. 159, § 5.

28-67-103. Petition for appointment.

A hearing may be had upon a petition for appointment of a conservator when:

It is represented to the circuit court, upon verified petition of any person or any relative or friend, that a person is an inhabitant or resident of the county and by reason of advanced age or physical disability is unable to manage his or her property; and

The person, if not himself or herself the petitioner, voluntarily consents to the granting of the petition and, if able to attend, is produced before the court at the hearing.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-701.

28-67-104. Notice of hearing.

Notice of a hearing in a conservatorship proceeding shall be served upon the following who do not appear or in writing waive notice of hearing:

The spouse, if any, of the person in question;

If there is no known spouse, at least one (1) of the nearest competent relatives by blood or marriage of the person in question; and

Any other person designated by the court.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-702.

28-67-105. Appointment.

If, after a full hearing and examination upon the petition, it appears to the circuit court that the person in question is by reason of advanced age or physical disability unable to manage his or her property, the circuit court may appoint a conservator of his or her estate.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-703.

28-67-106. Persons ineligible as conservator.

No person shall be appointed conservator of an estate who would be ineligible to act as guardian of the ward in such a case.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-704.

28-67-107. Management of estate — Bond.

Every conservator appointed as provided in this chapter shall have the care, custody, and management of the estate of his or her ward until he or she is legally discharged.

He or she must give bond to the State of Arkansas in like manner and with like conditions as provided for guardians of incompetent persons. However, the court may dispense with bond if the conservator is a bank or a trust company whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or a trust company chartered and regulated by appropriate state authority.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-705; Acts 1999, No. 635, § 2.

28-67-108. Powers and duties.

A conservator shall have the same powers and duties, except as to the custody of the person, as a guardian of an incompetent person.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-706.

28-67-109. Discharge.

A conservator may be discharged by the court upon the application of the ward or, otherwise, upon such notice to the conservator and next of kin of the ward as the court may determine reasonable and proper when it appears that the conservatorship is no longer necessary.

In the event of death, resignation, or removal of a conservator, the court, on the application of the former ward and upon such notice to the next of kin of the ward as the court may order, may certify that the ward is discharged by operation of law if it appears that the conservatorship of the ward is no longer necessary.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-707.

28-67-110. Compensation.

The conservator shall receive as compensation for his or her services the compensation provided by law for guardians.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-708.

28-67-111. Subsequent appointment of guardian — Effect.

Any subsequent appointment of a guardian of the ward as an incompetent person shall be an appointment as guardian of the person, only, of the ward and shall not include the appointment of the guardian of the estate of the ward or in any manner affect the custody, management, and the handling of the estate of the ward by the conservator so long as the conservatorship proceedings are pending.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 372, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-709.